South Carolina, session 2025-2026, S598.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.   The regulations of the Department of Social Services, relating to Approval of Kinship Family Foster Homes and Kinship Adoptive Homes for Children in Foster Care, designated as Regulation Document Number 5296, and submitted to the General Assembly pursuant to the provisions of Article 1, Chapter 23, Title 1 of the S.C. Code, are approved. SECTION 2.   This joint resolution takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XXX---- SUMMARY AS SUBMITTED BY PROMULGATING AGENCY. On September 28, 2023, the United States Department of Health and Human Services, Administration on Children and Families, issued a final rule amending 45 CFR Section 1355.20 to allow agencies to claim Title IV-E federal financial participation for the cost of foster care maintenance payments on behalf of an otherwise eligible child who is placed in a licensed or approved kinship foster family home using licensing standards for kinship foster family homes that differ from the standards used for non-relative foster family homes. The South Carolina Department of Social Services proposes to add Regulation 114-551 to establish discrete, less burdensome standards for the licensure of kinship foster family and kinship adoptive homes. The Notice of Drafting was published in the State Register on April 26, 2024 ----XX----